New York, session 2025-2026, A8077.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 511 of the laws of 2016 amending the 2 tax law relating to the imposition of an occupancy tax in the village of 3 Mount Kisco, as amended by chapter 429 of the laws of 2022, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed September 1, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11780-01-5